Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201277-2605
Cigarette purchase or sale records; inspection.

The books, records, papers, receipts, invoices, and supply of cigarettes
of any person, including wholesale and retail dealers, stamping agents, and persons transporting
cigarettes, subject to the provisions of sections 77-2601 to 77-2615 which
pertain to the purchase or sale of cigarettes shall be subject to inspection
at any time during ordinary business hours by the Tax Commissioner or his or her representatives.

Laws 1947, c. 267, § 5, p. 862;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 28.